Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1567.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 38, chapter 3, article 4, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 38-452, to read: START_STATUTE38-452. Sexually explicit materials; prohibition; violation; classification; acknowledgment form; applicability; definitions A. This state or a state agency, city, town, county or political subdivision of this state may not expose minors to sexually explicit materials and shall prohibit its contractors from exposing minors to sexually explicit materials. B. A facility or property owned, leased or managed by a person or entity prescribed by subsection A of this section may not be used for filming or facilitating sexually explicit acts. C. A person that acts with criminal negligence in violation of this section is guilty of a class 5 felony. D. This state or a state agency, city, town, county or political SUBDIVISION of this state shall require any individual who is hired as an employee or independent contractor of THIS STATE OR the STATE AGENCY, CITY, TOWN, COUNTY OR POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THIS STATE on or after the effective date of this section to sign a form acknowledging that the individual has read this section on the date that the individual is hired. E. This section does not apply to sexually explicit materials that may be displayed, presented or discussed in connection with a court proceeding when a minor has a legal right or obligation to be present at the proceeding. F. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Sexual conduct" means acts of masturbation, sexual intercourse or physical contact with a person's clothed or unclothed genitals, pubic area or buttocks or the female breast. 2. "Sexual excitement" means the condition of human male or female genitals when in a state of sexual stimulation or arousal. 3. "Sexually explicit materials" includes textual, visual or audio materials or materials accessed via any other medium that depict any of the following: (a) Sexual conduct. (b) Sexual excitement. (c) Ultimate sexual acts. 4. "Ultimate sexual acts" means sexual intercourse, vaginal or anal, fellatio, cunnilingus, bestiality or sodomy. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Implementation This state or a state agency, city, town, county or political subdivision of this state shall require each individual who is employed as an employee or independent contractor of this state or the state agency, city, town, county or political subdivision of this state on the effective date of this act to sign a form acknowledging that the individual has read section 38-452, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act.